Maryland, session 2026, HB0438.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) There is an Adult Prison School Board Model Development Committee.
(b) The Committee consists of the following members:
(1) one member of the Senate of Maryland, appointed by the President of
the Senate;
(2) one member of the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker of the
House;
(3) the Secretary of Public Safety and Correctional Services, or the
Secretary’s designee;
(4) the State Superintendent of Schools, or the State Superintendent’s
designee;
(5) the Secretary of Higher Education, or the Secretary’s designee;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0438*

HOUSE BILL 438
(6) the Superintendent for the Juvenile Services Education Program, or the
Superintendent’s designee;
(7) the Secretary of Labor, or the Secretary’s designee; and
(8) the following members appointed by the Governor:
(i) a representative of Maryland Correctional Enterprises;
(ii) a national expert on correctional education issues; and
(iii) a representative of a nonprofit organization focused on
correctional reform.
(c) The Governor shall appoint the chair of the Committee.
(d) The State Department of Education shall provide staff for the Committee.
(e) A member of the Committee:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Committee; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(f) The Committee shall:
(1) develop a comprehensive plan for a school board system to oversee
correctional education for individuals subject to the criminal and juvenile justice systems;
and
(2) conduct a fiscal mapping project for correctional education that
examines the needs and options necessary to sustain a school board system, including:
(i) examining internal and external funding sources;
(ii) determining funding required for teacher salaries, professional
development, educational services and supplies, and any other costs associated with
developing and implementing the school board system; and
(iii) developing an independent relationship with the Department of
Budget and Management to establish and manage capital and operating budgets.
(g) The school board system plan developed under subsection (f) of this section
shall include:

HOUSE BILL 438 3
(1) educational standards aligned with educational standards for school
systems in the State;
(2) a recommendation for the school board to be made up of individuals who
are residents of the State and who represent various State agencies or professional
backgrounds, including:
(i) representatives of the Department of Labor, the Department of
Public Safety and Correctional Services, the Office of the Correctional Ombudsman, the
Maryland Higher Education Commission, the State Department of Education, the
Department of Information Technology, and Maryland Correctional Enterprises;
(ii) formerly incarcerated students in the State;
(iii) representatives of relevant businesses or industry groups in the
State;
(iv) representatives of participating colleges or universities;
(v) representatives of a nonprofit prison reform organization; and
(vi) a State employee with experience related to budget processing
and analysis, prisons, and education.
(h) (1) On or before June 1, 2027, the Committee shall submit an interim
report of its findings and recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with §
2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly.
(2) On or before June 1, 2028, the Committee shall submit a final report of
its findings and recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the
State Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 2 years and 1 month and, at the end of June
30, 2028, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.